Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.670

Demonstration Cities and Metropolitan Development Act—Powers and limitations of public corporations, commissions or authorities created.

Any public corporation, commission or authority created as provided in RCW 35.21.660, may be empowered to own and sell real and personal property; to contract with individuals, associations and corporations, and the state and the United States; to sue and be sued; to loan and borrow funds; to do anything a natural person may do; and to perform all manner and type of community services and activities in furtherance of an agreement by a city or by the public corporation, commission or authority with the United States to carry out the purposes of the Demonstration Cities and Metropolitan Development Act of 1966: PROVIDED, That

(1) All liabilities incurred by such public corporation, commission or authority shall be satisfied exclusively from the assets and credit of such public corporation, commission or authority; and no creditor or other person shall have any recourse to the assets, credit or services of the municipal corporation creating the same on account of any debts, obligations or liabilities of such public corporation, commission or authority;

(2) Such public corporation, commission or authority shall have no power of eminent domain nor any power to levy taxes or special assessments;

(3) The name, the organization, the purposes and scope of activities, the powers and duties of the officers, and the disposition of property upon dissolution of such public corporation, commission or authority shall be set forth in its charter of incorporation or organization, or in a general ordinance of the city or both.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 177 s 7.]